homeworks-ivanin/foma/task2/lexicon.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root

Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

cat   Ninf;
city  Ninf;
fox   Ninf;
panic Ninf;
try   Ninf;
watch Ninf;
mouse+N:mouse #;
mouse+N+Sg:mouse #;
mouse+N+Pl:mice #;



LEXICON Ninf

+N+Sg:0   #;
+N+Pl:^s  #;
